lt-LT: Troleibuso energijos tiekimo tipas: Akumuliatorinis troleibusas (galintis važiuoti be tinklo); Hibridinis troleibusas (dyzelinis generatorius / pagalbinis variklis); Troleibusas su įkrovimu judant (IMC); Dviejų laidų kontaktinis tinklas (du srovės nuėmikliai); Vieno laido kontaktinis tinklas su įžeminimu; Kita
th: ประเภทแหล่งจ่ายไฟรถราง: รถรางไฟฟ้าแบตเตอรี่ (วิ่งนอกสายไฟได้); รถรางไฟฟ้าไฮบริด (เครื่องปั่นไฟดีเซล/พลังงานสำรอง); รถรางไฟฟ้าชาร์จขณะวิ่ง (IMC); สายไฟคู่เหนือศีรษะ (เสาคู่); สายไฟเดี่ยวเหนือศีรษะแบบมีสายกราวด์กลับ; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип питания троллейбуса: Аккумуляторный троллейбус (с автономным ходом); Гибридный троллейбус (дизель-генератор); Троллейбус с динамической подзарядкой (IMC); Двухпроводная контактная сеть; Однопроводная контактная сеть с возвратом через землю; Другое
es: Tipo de alimentación del trolebús: Trolebús con batería (operación sin catenaria); Trolebús híbrido (generador diésel/auxiliar); Trolebús con carga en movimiento (IMC); Doble cable aéreo (doble trole); Un cable aéreo con retorno por tierra; Otro
sv: Typ av strömförsörjning för trådbuss: Batteritrådbuss (kan köras utan tråd); Hybridtrådbuss (dieselgenerator/extra); Trådbuss med laddning under färd (IMC); Dubbel kontaktledning (dubbelpolig); Enkel kontaktledning med jordåtergång; Annat
sk-SK: Typ napájania trolejbusu: Batériový trolejbus (schopný jazdy mimo troleja); Hybridný trolejbus (naftový generátor/pomocný pohon); Trolejbus s nabíjaním počas jazdy (IMC); Dvojvodičové trolejové vedenie (dvojitý zberač); Jednovodičové trolejové vedenie so spätným zemnením; Iné
hu: Trolibusz áramellátásának típusa: Akkumulátoros trolibusz (önjáró); Hibrid trolibusz (dízelgenerátor/kiegészítő); Menet közben töltődő (IMC) trolibusz; Kétvezetékes felsővezeték (kétáramszedős); Egyvezetékes felsővezeték földvisszavezetéssel; Egyéb
da: Strømforsyningstype for trolleybus: Batteritrolleybus (kan køre uden tråd); Hybridtrolleybus (dieselgenerator/aux); Trolleybus med opladning under kørsel (IMC); Dobbelt køreledning (dobbelt pol); Enkelt køreledning med jordretur; Andet
el: Τύπος τροφοδοτικού τρόλεϊ: Τρόλεϊ μπαταρίας (με δυνατότητα κίνησης εκτός δικτύου); Υβριδικό τρόλεϊ (γεννήτρια ντίζελ/βοηθητική); Τρόλεϊ φόρτισης εν κινήσει (IMC); Εναέριο διπλό καλώδιο (διπλού πόλου); Εναέριο μονό καλώδιο με επιστροφή γείωσης; Άλλο
fi: Johdinauton virtalähteen tyyppi: Akkujohdinauto (mahdollisuus ajaa ilman johtimia); Hybridijohdinauto (dieselgeneraattori/apumoottori); Ajossa latautuva (IMC) johdinauto; Kaksilankainen ajojohdin (kaksi virroitinta); Yksilankainen ajojohdin maapaluulla; Muu
pl: Typ zasilania trolejbusu: Trolejbus bateryjny (możliwość jazdy bez trakcji); Trolejbus hybrydowy (generator spalinowy / zasilanie pomocnicze); Trolejbus z ładowaniem w ruchu (IMC); Dwuprzewodowa sieć trakcyjna (dwa odbieraki); Jednoprzewodowa sieć trakcyjna z uziemieniem; Inne
pt-BR: Trólebus tipo de alimentação elétrica: Trólebus a bateria (capaz de operar fora da rede); Trólebus híbrido (gerador a diesel/auxiliar); Trólebus com carregamento em movimento (IMC); Fio duplo aéreo (haste dupla); Fio único aéreo com retorno por terra; Outro
zh-CN: 无轨电车供电方式: 电池无轨电车（支持脱线行驶）; 混合动力无轨电车（柴油发电机/辅助）; 动态充电 (IMC) 无轨电车; 架空双线（双极）; 带有接地回路的架空单线; 其他
de: Stromversorgungsart des Oberleitungsbusses: Batterie-Oberleitungsbus (netzunabhängig); Hybrid-Oberleitungsbus (Dieselgenerator/Aux); In-Motion-Charging-Oberleitungsbus (IMC); Zweidraht-Oberleitung (zweipolig); Eindraht-Oberleitung mit Erdrückführung; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Tipul sursei de alimentare a troleibuzului: Troleibuz cu baterii (poate rula fără fir); Troleibuz hibrid (generator diesel/aux); Troleibuz cu încărcare în mișcare (IMC); Fir dublu aerian (captator dublu); Fir unic aerian cu retur prin masă; Altele
ko: 트롤리버스 전원 공급 유형: 배터리 트롤리버스(오프와이어 가능); 하이브리드 트롤리버스(디젤 발전기/보조); 주행 중 충전(IMC) 트롤리버스; 가공 복선(듀얼 폴); 접지 귀환 방식 가공 단선; 기타
nb: Strømforsyningstype for trolleybuss: Batteridrevet trolleybuss (kan kjøre uten kontaktledning); Hybrid-trolleybuss (dieselgenerator/hjelpemotor); Trolleybuss med In-Motion Charging (IMC); Dobbel kjøreledning (to poler); Enkel kjøreledning med jordretur; Annet
fr: Type d’alimentation du trolleybus: Trolleybus à batterie (autonome sans ligne); Trolleybus hybride (génératrice diesel/auxiliaire); Trolleybus à recharge en mouvement (IMC); Bifilaire aérien (deux perches); Monofilaire aérien avec retour par la terre; Autre
en: Trolleybus power supply type: Battery trolleybus (off-wire capable); Hybrid trolleybus (diesel generator/aux); In-motion charging (IMC) trolleybus; Overhead dual-wire (dual pole); Overhead single-wire with ground return; Other
it: Tipo di alimentazione del filobus: Filobus a batteria (con marcia autonoma); Filobus ibrido (generatore/ausiliario diesel); Filobus con ricarica in movimento (IMC); Bifilare aerea (doppia asta); Monofilare aerea con ritorno a terra; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta napajanja trolejbusa: Baterijski trolejbus (zmožnost vožnje brez žic); Hibridni trolejbus (dizelski generator/pomožni pogon); Trolejbus s polnjenjem med vožnjo (IMC); Nadzemni dvožični (dvojni drog); Nadzemni enožični z ozemljitvenim povratkom; Drugo
ja: トロリーバス電源供給タイプ: バッテリー式トロリーバス (架線レス対応); ハイブリッドトロリーバス (ディーゼル発電機 / 補助); 走行中給電 (IMC) トロリーバス; 架空複線式 (デュアルポール); 架空単線式および大地帰路; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de fonte de alimentação do trólei elétrico: Tróleicarro a bateria (capaz de circular sem fios); Tróleicarro híbrido (gerador a gasóleo/auxiliar); Tróleicarro com carregamento em movimento (IMC); Dois fios aéreos (dois polos); Fio único aéreo com retorno por terra; Outro
tr: Troleybüs güç besleme tipi: Bataryalı troleybüs (hatsız çalışabilen); Hibrit troleybüs (dizel jeneratör/yardımcı); Hareket halindeyken şarj olan (IMC) troleybüs; Çift havai hatlı (çift kutuplu); Toprak dönüşlü tek havai hatlı; Diğer
vi: Loại nguồn điện xe buýt điện: Xe buýt điện bánh lốp chạy pin (có thể chạy không dây); Xe buýt điện bánh lốp lai (máy phát điện diesel/phụ trợ); Xe buýt điện bánh lốp sạc khi di chuyển (IMC); Dây cáp đôi trên cao (cần đôi); Dây cáp đơn trên cao có dây nối đất; Khác
nl: Trolleybus voedingssysteem type: Batterijtrolleybus (kan zonder bovenleiding); Hybride trolleybus (dieselgenerator/aux); In-motion charging (IMC) trolleybus; Dubbele bovenleiding (twee stroomafnemers); Enkele bovenleiding met aarding (grondretour); Anders
zh-TW: 無軌電車供電類型: 電池無軌電車 (可離線行駛); 混合動力無軌電車 (柴油發電機/輔助動力); 動態充電 (IMC) 無軌電車; 雙架空電纜 (雙集電桿); 單架空電纜含接地迴路; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta napajanja trolejbusa: Trolejbus na baterije (mogućnost vožnje bez mreže); Hibridni trolejbus (dizel-generator / pomoćni pogon); Trolejbus s punjenjem u vožnji (IMC); Dvostruki zračni vod (dvostruka trola); Jednostruki zračni vod s povratom preko zemlje; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип захранване на тролейбус: Акумулаторен тролейбус (с възможност за движение без мрежа); Хибриден тролейбус (дизелов генератор/спомагателен); Тролейбус със зареждане в движение (IMC); Въздушна двупроводна мрежа (двойна тролея); Въздушна еднопроводна мрежа със заземяване; Друго
cs: Typ napájení trolejbusu: Bateriový trolejbus (s autonomním pojezdem); Hybridní trolejbus (s dieselagregátem / pomocným pohonem); Trolejbus s dynamickým nabíjením (IMC); Dvouvodičové trolejové vedení (dvoupólové); Jednovodičové trolejové vedení se zemním návratem; Ostatní